Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-312
Commission permission; procedure.

When the permission of the commission is required as a prerequisite to any activity set out in sections 37-305 to 37-313, such permission shall be established by resolution of the commission. The resolution may set out the circumstances under which the supervisor or managing official in charge of any area under the ownership or control of the commission may give such permission in emergency situations, and such resolution may further provide for the revocation of such permission by the secretary of the commission or by the supervisor or managing official of any area under the ownership and control of the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 70.